Illinois, session 104th, HB3941.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4ARTICLE 15    Section 1. The following named amounts, or so much thereof 6as may be necessary, respectively, for the objects and 7purposes hereinafter named, are appropriated to meet the 8ordinary and contingent expenses of the Illinois Racing Board:9PAYABLE FROM THE HORSE RACING FUND10  For Personal Services.............................1,494,00011  For State Contributions to State12   Employees' Retirement System.......................761,50013  For State Contributions to14   Social Security....................................107,90015  For Group Insurance.................................354,00016  For Contractual Services............................213,50017  For Travel...........................................18,50018  For Commodities.......................................1,80019  For Equipment.........................................2,30020  For Electronic Data Processing.......................22,00021  For Telecommunications Services......................52,00022  For Operation of Auto Equipment.......................5,50023  For Refunds...........................................1,000  HB3941- 2 -OMB104 00105 LAH 10105 b1  For Expenses related to the Laboratory2   Program............................................563,1003  For Expenses related to the Regulation4   and Promotion of Racing Program and,5   when so ordered by the Board, to augment6   organization licensee purse accounts,7   to be used exclusively for making purse8   awards when such funds are available.............1,475,0009    Total                                          $5,072,100 10    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 112025.